Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4214.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 601b. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
act, a person an individual responsible for a moving violation in a
work zone, at an emergency scene, or in a school zone during the
period beginning 30 minutes before school in the morning and
through 30 minutes after school in the afternoon, or in a school
bus zone is subject to a fine that is double the fine otherwise
prescribed for that moving violation.
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


(2) A person An individual who commits a moving violation in a
work zone or a school bus zone for which not fewer than 3 points
are assigned under section 320a and as a result causes injury to
another person individual in the work zone or school bus zone is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than
$1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.
(3) A person An individual who commits a moving violation in a
work zone or school bus zone for which not fewer than 3 points are
assigned under section 320a and as a result causes death to another
person individual in the work zone or school bus zone is guilty of
a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $7,500.00 or by
imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or both.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply if the injury or
death was caused by the negligence of the injured or deceased
person individual in the work zone or school bus zone.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency scene" means a traffic accident, a serious
incident caused by weather conditions, or another occurrence along
a highway or street for which a police officer, firefighter, or
emergency medical personnel are summoned to aid an injured victim.
(b) "Moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited
under this act or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to
this act that occurs while a person an individual is operating a
motor vehicle, and for which the person individual is subject to a
fine.
(c) "School bus zone" means the area lying within 20 feet of a
school bus that has stopped or is stopping and is displaying 2
alternately flashing red or yellow lights at the same level, except
as described in section 682(2).
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


(d) "School zone" means that term as defined in section 627a.
Sec. 682. (1) The operator of a vehicle overtaking or meeting
a school bus that has stopped and is displaying 2 alternately
flashing red lights located at the same level shall bring the
vehicle to a full stop not less than 20 feet from the school bus
and shall not proceed until the school bus resumes motion or the
visual signals are no longer actuated. The operator of a vehicle
that fails to stop for a school bus as required by this subsection,
that passes a school bus in violation of this subsection, or that
fails to stop for a school bus in violation of an ordinance that is
substantially similar to this subsection, is responsible for a
civil infraction and must be ordered to pay, for a violation of
subdivision (a), a civil fine of not less than $100.00 and not more
than $500.00, and for a violation of subdivision (b), a civil fine
of not less than $100.00 and not more than $250.00. A citation
issued under this subsection is not a citation for a camera-based
violation under subsection (4), and a civil fine for a violation of
this subsection must be applied as provided in section 909(1). Both
of the following apply to the operator of a vehicle overtaking or
meeting a school bus that has stopped or is stopping and is
displaying 2 alternately flashing lights located at the same level:
(a) If the lights are red, the operator shall bring the
vehicle to a full stop not less than 20 feet from the school bus
and shall not proceed until the school bus resumes motion or the
visual signals are no longer actuated.
(b) If the lights are yellow, the operator shall bring the
vehicle to a full stop, if the stop can be safely made, not less
than 20 feet from the school bus and shall not proceed until the
school bus resumes motion or the visual signals are no longer
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


actuated. If the stop cannot be safely made, the operator shall
reduce speed and pass the school bus with caution.
(2) Subsection (1) applies to the entire width of the roadway
on which the school bus has stopped or is stopping. Except where a
crosswalk or pedestrian walkway is present, the operator of a
vehicle on a highway that has been divided into 2 roadways by
leaving a raised intervening space, or by a physical barrier, or
clearly indicated dividing sections so constructed as to impede
vehicular traffic, is not required to stop upon meeting a school
bus that has stopped or is stopping across the raised intervening
space, physical barrier, or dividing section.
(3) In a proceeding for a violation of subsection (1), proof
that the particular vehicle described in the citation was in
violation of subsection (1), together with proof that the defendant
named in the citation was, at the time of the violation, the
registered owner of the vehicle, constitutes a rebuttable
presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the driver
of the vehicle at the time of the violation.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if
the operator of a vehicle fails to stop for a school bus as
required under subsection (1), or passes a school bus in violation
of subsection (1), or fails to stop for a school bus in violation
of an ordinance that is substantially similar to subsection (1),
and the school bus is equipped with a stop-arm camera system under
section 20 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL
257.1820, the photograph captured or video recorded by the stop-arm
camera system may be used as evidence in a proceeding for a camera-
based violation. A school district that uses a stop-arm camera
system shall provide a photograph captured or video recorded by a
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


stop-arm camera system for use as evidence in a proceeding for a
camera-based violation if requested by an investigating law
enforcement agency. A photograph or video recorded by a stop-arm
camera system is admissible as evidence in a proceeding for a
camera-based violation to the extent permitted by the rules of
evidence of this state. However, a photograph captured or video
recorded by a stop-arm camera system, is not required for the
prosecution of a violation of subsection (1).
(5) For a camera-based violation, the operator of a vehicle is
responsible for a civil infraction and must be ordered to pay a
civil fine of not less than $100.00 and not more than $500.00.
(6) For a camera-based violation, by not later than 30 days
after receiving stop-arm camera system information as described in
section 20 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL
257.1820, a law enforcement agency may review that information to
determine if there is sufficient evidence that a violation of
subsection (1) occurred and, if there is sufficient evidence that a
violation occurred, may issue a citation.
(7) For a camera-based violation, if a law enforcement agency
determines that it has sufficient evidence that a violation of
subsection (1) has occurred, the law enforcement agency may
initiate an action by mailing via first-class mail a citation to
the operator of the vehicle involved in the violation. The mailing
must include all of the following information:
(a) A copy of the captured photograph or selected images from
a recorded video showing the vehicle involved in the violation.
(b) If the violation is based on a recorded video, a method to
review the recorded video on a website.
(c) The date, time, and location of the alleged violation.
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


(d) A statement of the facts inferred from the captured
photograph or recorded video.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a
civil fine for a camera-based violation must be paid to the county
treasurer or the county treasurer's designee, who shall distribute
the paid civil fines not less than monthly to the school district
that operates the school bus. A school district that receives money
under this subsection must use that money for school transportation
safety-related purposes.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Camera-based violation" means a violation of subsection
(1) based solely on a photograph captured or a video recorded by a
stop-arm camera system.
(b) "Law enforcement agency" means any of the following:
(i) The department of state police.
(ii) The county sheriff's office.
(iii) The police department of a local unit of government.
(iv) Any other governmental law enforcement agency in this
state.
(c) "Local unit of government" means a state university or
college or a county, city, village, or township.
(d) "School district" means that term as defined in section 6
of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.6, and a public
school academy as that term is defined in section 5 of the revised
school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5.
(e) "Stop-arm camera system" means that term as defined in
section 5 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL
257.1805.
Sec. 907. (1) A violation of this act, or a local ordinance
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, that is
designated a civil infraction must not be considered a lesser
included offense of a criminal offense.
(2) Permission may be granted for payment of a civil fine and
costs to be made within a specified period of time or in specified
installments but, unless permission is included in the order or
judgment, the civil fine and costs must be payable immediately.
Except as otherwise provided, a person found responsible or
responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction must pay
costs as provided in subsection (4) and 1 or more of the following
civil fines, as applicable:
(a) Except as otherwise provided, for a civil infraction under
this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a
provision of this act, the person must be ordered to pay a civil
fine of not more than $100.00.
(b) If the civil infraction was a moving violation that
resulted in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an
individual, or any other object, the civil fine ordered under this
section is increased by $25.00 but the total civil fine must not be
more than $100.00.
(c) For a violation of section 240, the civil fine ordered
under this section is $15.00.
(d) For a violation of section 312a(4)(a), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $250.00.
(e) For a first violation of section 319f(1), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $2,500.00 or more
than $2,750.00; for a second or subsequent violation, the civil
fine must not be less than $5,000.00 or more than $5,500.00.
(f) For a violation of section 319g(1)(a), the civil fine
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


ordered under this section must not be more than $10,000.00.
(g) For a violation of section 319g(1)(g), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $2,750.00 or more
than $25,000.00.
(h) For a violation of section 602b, the civil fine ordered
under this section must be as follows:
(i) For a violation of section 602b(1), either of the
following:
(A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $100.00 for
a first offense and $250.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(B) If the violation involves an accident, $200.00 for a first
offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(ii) For a violation of section 602b(2), either of the
following:
(A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $200.00 for
a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(B) If the violation involves an accident, $400.00 for a first
offense and $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense.
(i) For a violation of section 627c, the civil fine ordered
under this section must not be more than $150.00 for a second
violation as described in section 627c(2)(b) and $300.00 for a
third or subsequent violation described in section 627c(2)(c).
(j) For a violation of section 674(1)(s) or a local ordinance
that substantially corresponds to section 674(1)(s), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more
than $250.00.
(k) For a violation of section 676a(3), the civil fine ordered
under this section must not be more than $10.00.
(l) For a violation of section 676c, the civil fine ordered
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


under this section is $1,000.00.
(m) For a violation of section 682 682(1)(a) or a local
ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 682, 682(1)(a),
the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than
$100.00 or more than $500.00.
(n) For a violation of section 682(1)(b) or a local ordinance
that substantially corresponds to section 682(1)(b), the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more
than $250.00.
(o) (n) For a violation of section 710d, the civil fine
ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00, subject to
subsection (11).
(p) (o) For a violation of section 710e, the civil fine and
court costs ordered under this subsection must be $25.00.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
individual is determined to be responsible or responsible "with
explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local
ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act
while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the individual must be
ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine
of not more than $250.00.
(4) If a civil fine is ordered under subsection (2) or (3),
the judge or district court magistrate shall summarily tax and
determine the costs of the action, which are not limited to the
costs taxable in ordinary civil actions, and may include all
expenses, direct and indirect, to which the plaintiff has been put
in connection with the civil infraction, up to the entry of
judgment. Costs must not be ordered in excess of $100.00. A civil
fine ordered under subsection (2) or (3) must not be waived unless
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


costs ordered under this subsection are waived. Except as otherwise
provided by law, costs are payable to the general fund of the
plaintiff.
(5) In addition to a civil fine and costs ordered under
subsection (2) or (3) and subsection (4) and the justice system
assessment ordered under subsection (12), the judge or district
court magistrate may order the individual to attend and complete a
program of treatment, education, or rehabilitation.
(6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions
permitted under subsections (2), (3), and (5) only to the extent
expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the
district court district.
(7) Each district of the district court and each municipal
court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and
assessments to be imposed for civil infractions that occur within
the respective district or city. If a schedule is established, it
must be prominently posted and readily available for public
inspection. A schedule need not include all violations that are
designated by law or ordinance as civil infractions. A schedule may
exclude cases on the basis of a defendant's prior record of civil
infractions or traffic offenses, or a combination of civil
infractions and traffic offenses.
(8) The state court administrator shall annually publish and
distribute to each district and court a recommended range of civil
fines and costs for first-time civil infractions. This
recommendation is not binding on the courts that have jurisdiction
over civil infractions but is intended to act as a normative guide
for judges and district court magistrates and a basis for public
evaluation of disparities in the imposition of civil fines and
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


costs throughout this state.
(9) If a person has received a civil infraction citation for
defective safety equipment on a vehicle under section 683, the
court shall waive a civil fine, costs, and assessments on receipt
of certification by a law enforcement agency that repair of the
defective equipment was made before the appearance date on the
citation.
(10) A default in the payment of a civil fine or costs ordered
under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or a justice system assessment
ordered under subsection (12), or an installment of the fine,
costs, or assessment, may be collected by a means authorized for
the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4001 to 600.4065, or
under chapter 60 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA
236, MCL 600.6001 to 600.6098.
(11) Before the effective date of 2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025,
the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an
individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation
of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on
the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition,
purchase, or rental of a child seating system meeting the
requirements of section 710d. Beginning on the effective date of
2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025, the court may waive any civil fine,
cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil
infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the
individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies
the court with evidence of acquisition of a child seating system
that meets the requirements of section 710d and evidence that the
individual has received education from a certified child passenger
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


safety technician.
(12) In addition to any civil fines or costs ordered to be
paid under this section, the judge or district court magistrate
shall order the defendant to pay a justice system assessment of
$40.00 for each civil infraction determination, except for a
parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs
imposed are $10.00 or less. On payment of the assessment, the clerk
of the court shall transmit the assessment collected to the state
treasury to be deposited into the justice system fund created in
section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL
600.181. An assessment levied under this subsection is not a civil
fine for purposes of section 909.
(13) If a person has received a citation for a violation of
section 223, the court shall waive any civil fine, costs, and
assessment on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency
that the person, before the appearance date on the citation,
produced a valid registration certificate that was valid on the
date the violation of section 223 occurred.
(14) If a person has received a citation for a violation of
section 328(1) for failing to produce a certificate of insurance
under section 328(2), the court may waive the fee described in
section 328(3)(c) and shall waive any fine, costs, and any other
fee or assessment otherwise authorized under this act on receipt of
verification by the court that the person, before the appearance
date on the citation, produced valid proof of insurance that was in
effect when the violation of section 328(1) occurred. Insurance
obtained after the violation occurred does not make the person
eligible for a waiver under this subsection.
(15) If a person is determined to be responsible or
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726


responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this
act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a
provision of this act and the civil infraction arises out of the
ownership or operation of a commercial quadricycle, the person must
be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil
fine of not more than $500.00.
(16) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act
or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance that
substantially corresponds to this act that involves the operation
of a motor vehicle and for which a fine may be assessed.
Final Page
JJR H01586'25 (H-3) 4zb726